Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-8] Status and rights of personnel. (a)
All state and county officials, officers, and employees are considered
"emergency workers" and shall perform functions as determined by
their respective state or county department director during emergencies or
disasters.

(b) If any state or county official, officer,
or employee is engaged in carrying out this chapter in lieu of the official,
officer, or employee's regular office or employment, the amount of the
official, officer, or employee's compensation shall not be adversely affected,
and the official, officer, or employee's rights in or under the laws relating
to vacation and leave, the retirement system, civil service or the like, shall
not be adversely affected.

(c) All persons, including volunteers whose
services have been accepted by authorized persons, while engaged in the
performance of duty pursuant to this chapter, including duty performed during
exercises and training, shall be deemed state employees if the performance of
duty is for the State, or county employees if the performance of duty is for
the county, and shall have the powers, duties, rights, and privileges of such
in the performance of their duties, except as may be prescribed by or under the
authority of the governor or the mayor, pursuant to this chapter.

(d) In case of injury or death arising out of
and in the performance of duty pursuant to this chapter, including duty
performed during periods of training, all persons having the status of
official, officer, or employee of the State or county, pursuant to this
section, and their dependents, shall be entitled to all of the benefits
provided in chapter 386, including medical services and supplies, and in case
of injury or death, no public official shall be excluded from the coverage of
chapter 386 by reason of being an elected official. For the purposes of the
benefits, average weekly wages shall be computed upon the basis set forth in
section 386-51, or upon the basis of earnings from the usual employment of the
person, or upon the basis of earnings at the rate of $20 per week, whichever is
most favorable to the claimant or claimants. The costs thereof, in cases of
state employees, shall be a charge upon the state insurance fund and, in cases
of county employees, shall be a charge upon the county insurance fund; provided
that the governor or mayor may effect such insurance in respect of the
obligations assumed pursuant to this section and as may be available under any
mutual aid agreement or act of Congress. Nothing herein shall adversely affect
the right of any person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act
of Congress. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next